Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1732.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin FAMILY SUPPORTIVE HOUSING GRANT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment; purpose. new text end new text begin The commissioner of human services must establish a family supportive housing grant program to award competitive grants to eligible applicants operating supportive housing for families. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) The definitions in this subdivision apply to this section. new text end new text begin (b) "Family" means a nontemporary household unit that includes at least one child and one parent or legal guardian. new text end new text begin (c) "Family permanent supportive housing" means housing that: new text end new text begin (1) is not time limited; new text end new text begin (2) is affordable for those at or below 30 percent of the area median income; new text end new text begin (3) offers specialized support services to residents tailored to the needs of children and families; and new text end new text begin (4) is available to families with multiple barriers to obtaining and maintaining housing, including but not limited to those who are homeless or at risk of homelessness; those with mental illness, substance use disorders, and other disabilities; and those referred by child protection services. new text end new text begin (d) "Resident" means a resident of family permanent supportive housing. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Eligibility. new text end new text begin To be eligible for a grant under this section, an applicant must be a nonprofit organization or Tribal government operating family permanent supportive housing. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Application and administration. new text end new text begin (a) When applying to the commissioner for a grant under this section, each applicant must include the number of families they estimate to serve. new text end new text begin (b) An eligible grantee shall receive $15,000 per family to provide the services described in subdivision 6. Up to available appropriations, the commissioner must award grant money to eligible grantees based on the estimated number of families served. The commissioner must use best efforts to ensure that 60 percent of the families served are within the seven-county metropolitan area and 40 percent of the families served are outside the seven-county metropolitan area. The commissioner must use best efforts to ensure that ten percent of the overall families served are members of Minnesota's Tribal Nations. new text end new text begin (c) By June 30, 2026, each grantee must provide a report to the commissioner on how many families the grantee served and what services the grantee provided. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Eligible uses of grant money. new text end new text begin An eligible applicant that receives grant money under this section must use the money for the services described in subdivision 6. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Specialized family support services. new text end new text begin Specialized family support services are nonmandatory, trauma-informed, and culturally appropriate services designed to help family residents maintain secure, dignified housing and provide a safe, stable environment for children. Services provided may include but are not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) age-appropriate child-centric services for education and enrichment; new text end new text begin (2) stabilization services such as: new text end new text begin (i) educational assessment and referrals to educational programs; new text end new text begin (ii) career planning, work skills training, job placement, and employment retention; new text end new text begin (iii) budgeting and money management; new text end new text begin (iv) referral for counseling regarding violence and sexual exploitation; new text end new text begin (v) referral for medical or psychiatric services or substance use disorder treatment; new text end new text begin (vi) parenting skills training; new text end new text begin (vii) self-sufficiency support services or life skills training, including tenant education and support to sustain housing; and new text end new text begin (viii) aftercare and follow-up services; and new text end new text begin (3) 24-hour-a-day, seven-day-a-week on-site staffing, including but not limited to front desk and security. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; FAMILY SUPPORTIVE HOUSING GRANT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for the family supportive housing grant program. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end